dictsource/es_rules
// translation rules for Spanish
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Conditional rules
// ?1  Castilian
// ?2  Latin America
// ?3  mbrola VZ1

.L01 l r y
.L02 b d g n m         // change [s] to [z] before these
.L03 f h j r s y z       // allow [B] [D] [Q] before these consonants
.L04 b v f p      // labials, nasals are [m]
.L05 g k          // velars, nasals are [N]
.L06 j w l r b d g n m p t k c

.group a
        a          a
        ai         aI
        ay (K      aI
        ay (_      'aI
        au         aU
        au (_      'aU


.group b
        b          b
     _) b ($unpr   b         // phoneme definition may change it to [B]
     _) b (L01A    b         // Only bl, br are allowed at start of word
     _) b (A       b
        b (A       B
        b (cY      B
        b (L03     B
     m) b          b
     n) b          b
        b (iA      b
        b (uA      b

.group c
        c          k
     _) c (L01A    k         // allow: cl cr  at start of word
     _) ch         tS        // allow _ch

        c (Y       T         // ce, ci
        ch         tS
     A) ck         k

.group d
        d          d
     _) d ($unpr   d         // phoneme definition may change it to [D]
     _) d (rA      d
     _) d (A       d
        d (A       D
        d (_       d
        d (_A      D
        d (cY      D
        d (L03     D
     l) d          d

        d (v       D
     m) d          d
     n) d          d
     r) d          d


.group e
        e          e
//          e (CK      E
        e (nK      E
        e (r       E
        e (Ch      e
    Ar) e          E
        ei         eI
        ey (K      eI
        ey (_      'eI
        eu         eU
        eu (_      'eU


.group f
        f          f
     _) f (L01A    f         // allow fl fr  at start of word


.group g
        g          g
     _) g ($unpr   g         // phoneme definition may change it to [Q]
     _) g (L01A    g
     _) gh (A      g         // allow _gh in foreign words
     _) gn (A      n
     _) g (A       g
        g (A       Q
        g (_A      Q
        g (_       g
        g (cY      Q
        g (L03     Q
     m) g          g
     n) g          g
        g (Y+      x         // ge gi
     n) g (_                 // ing

.group h
        h                    // silent
     _) hi (A      j


.group i
        i          i
        i (A       j
     C) i (A       j
    gu) i (A       j
?!3  l) i (A       %i
?!3  r) i (A       %i
?!3 Al) i (A       j
?!3 Ar) i (A       j

.group j
        j          x


.group k
        k          k
     _) k (L01A    k         // allow kl kr  at start of word


.group l
        l          l
        ll (_      l^
     _) ll (A      l^        // allowe _ll
?2   _) ll (A      J^
?2      ll         j:
?2  n_) ll (A      dZ
        ll         l^



.group m
        m          m
       // @) m (_       =m
     _) mn (em     n
     _) mb (A      mb


.group n
        n          n
        n (L04     m
        n (_L04    m
        n (L05     N
        n (_L05    N
        n (j       N
        ny (A      n^        // catalan words
     _) nh (A      n

.group o
        o          o
        o (CK      O
        o (r       O
        o (Ch      o
    Ar) o          O
        oi         oI
        oy (K      oI
        oy (_      'oI
        ou         ow

.group p
        p          p
     _) p (L01A    p         // allow  pl pr  at start of word
        p (t       p:
     _) ph (A      f
        ph (@      f
        ph (K      f
     _) ps (i      s
     _) ps (eudo   s
     _) pt (ero    t
     _) pt (ol     t


.group q
        q          k
        qu (Y      k         // que, qui
     _) qw (A      kw        // qwerty


.group r
        r          r
        r (_       r
        r (t       r
     A) r (A       r
     C) r (A       r
     _) r (A       R2
     l) r (A       R2
     m) r (A       R2
     n) r (A       R2
     s) r (A       R2
        rr         R2


.group s
        s          s
     &) s (_S1     s
     _) s (K@      s
        ss         s:
     _) sh (A      S
     _) sh (L01A   S
        sh (K      S
?!1     sc (Y      s         // sce sci for non castilian accent

.group t
        t          t
     _) t (L01A    t         // all tr at start of word
     _) th (@      t
        th (K      t
     _) tx (A      tS
        tx         tS


.group u
        u          u
        u (u       u
        u (A       w
        !?3        l)        u (A       %u
        !?3        r)        u (A       %u
     g) u (e 
     g) u (i 
     g) u (é 
     g) u (í 

.group v
        v          b
     _) v ($unpr   b         // phoneme definition may change it to [B]
     _) v (L01A    b         // Only bl, br are allowed at start of word
     _) v (A       b
        v (A       B
        v (cY      B
        v (L03     B
     m) v          b
     n) v          b
        v (iA      b
        v (uA      b


.group w
        w          w
     _) wh (A      w


.group x
        x          ks
     _) x ($unpr   s         // ?
?!1     xc (Y      ks        // xce xci for non castilian accent
    me) x (ic      x         // mexicano, mexicana, etc.

.group y
        y          i
     _) y ($unpr   J
    _m) y (A       j
    _l) y (A       j
        y (A       j:
     _) y (A       J^
     u) y (K       j:
    n_) y (A       dZ
        y (_       i

.group z
        z          T
        zz         ts


.group
        á          ''a
        é          ''E
        í          ''i
        ó          ''O
        ú          ''u
        ü          u
        ñ          n^
        $          d'Olar

     _) - (_D      m'EnOs
    A_) - (_D      _
    C_) - (_D      _

        , (D       kOma
